Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Restrictions and Prohibitions on Membership in Public Retirement or Pension Systems

47-1-20.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Conviction” means a judgment of conviction for the commission of a crime which is entered upon a verdict or plea of guilty.

(1.1)

“Drug related crime” means a felony specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 16-13-30 and any felony specified in Code Section 16-13-31.

(1.2)

“Economic impact of a public employment related crime” means the total of the economic gain to the perpetrator of a public employment related crime and the economic loss to the public entity.

“Employee contribution” means that part of the compensation of a public employee which is paid by the employee or by the employer on the employee’s behalf to a public retirement system as a requirement for membership in the public retirement system.

“Final conviction” means a conviction which has been upheld after the convicted person has exhausted all appeals of the conviction.

“Political subdivision” means any county, municipality, or local school district.

“Public employee” means elected and appointed officials and employees of the state or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state and elected and appointed officials and employees of any political subdivision or authority or other agency of a political subdivision.

“Public employment related crime” means any one or more of the following crimes:

Theft as provided in any one or more of Code Sections 16-8-2 through 16-8-9 when the theft is by an officer or employee of a government in breach of duties as such officer or employee and conviction for such crime is punishable under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 16-8-12;

Any felony provided for in Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16, relating to abuse of governmental office;

Making false statements or concealing facts in matters within the jurisdiction of the state or a political subdivision as provided in Code Section 16-10-20;

Conspiracy to defraud the state or a political subdivision as provided in Code Section 16-10-21;

Stealing, altering, or concealing public records as provided in Code Section 45-11-1;

Selling offices or dividing fees as provided in Code Section 45-11-2; and

Any felony conviction for any of the crimes specified in subparagraphs (A) through (E) of this paragraph under the laws of any other state or the United States; provided, however, that the provisions of this subparagraph shall apply to persons who first or again become members of a public retirement system on or after July 1, 2008.

“Public retirement system” means any retirement or pension system now or hereafter created by or pursuant to the authority of Georgia law or the Constitution of Georgia which has public employees as members of the retirement or pension system.

“Vested” means having sufficient creditable service as a member of a public retirement system to qualify to receive a retirement benefit upon retirement or termination from public service or upon attaining retirement age if public service is terminated prior to attaining such age.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1624, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 2019, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 126, §§ 1, 2/HB 255; Ga. L. 2009, p. 368, § 1/SB 48.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added paragraph (1.2); in subparagraph (6)(E), deleted “and” from the end; in subparagraph (6)(F), substituted “; and” for a period at the end; and added subparagraph (6)(G).

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 30, 2009, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct this title, in paragraph (1.2), substituted “public employment related” for “public related” and substituted “a public employment related” for “an employment related”.

47-1-21.
Termination of membership in public retirement system for committing public employment related crimes; applicability to employees on July 1, 1985; determination of benefits.

This Code section shall apply to public employees in service on July 1, 1985, as long as such employees remain in continuous service as public employees. Any public employee in service on July 1, 1985, who ceases to be a public employee on or after that date and who subsequently again becomes a public employee shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-1-22 upon again becoming a public employee. Any person who was a public employee prior to July 1, 1985, and who ceased to be a public employee prior to that date shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-1-22 if such person again becomes a public employee after July 1, 1985.

If a public employee commits a public employment related crime on or after July 1, 1985, in the capacity of a public employee and is convicted for the commission of such crime, such employee’s membership in any public retirement system shall terminate on the date of final conviction and such employee shall not at any time thereafter be eligible for membership in any public retirement system. For any such public employee finally convicted for the commission of a public employment related crime, the right to any benefit or any other right under any public retirement system in which the employee is a member shall be determined as of the date of final conviction.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1624, § 1.

47-1-22.
Reduction and forfeiture of rights and benefits by public employees after July 1, 1985, for committing public employment related crimes; reimbursement of contributions.

This Code section shall apply to public employees first or again becoming public employees after July 1, 1985.

If a public employee commits a public employment related crime in the capacity of a public employee and is convicted for the commission of such crime, upon final conviction such person’s benefits under a public retirement or pension system, including any survivor’s benefits if applicable, shall be reduced by an amount equal to three times the economic impact of the crime, as determined pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 47-1-25. Payment of such benefits shall cease until such amount has been forfeited, after which benefits shall be restored. If the person has not begun to receive a benefit, the deduction shall commence at the time such benefits would normally begin. For purposes of this subsection, the term “benefit” shall not include a refund of employee contributions without interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1624, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 126, § 3/HB 255.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote subsection (b).

47-1-22.1.
Rights and benefits of employees convicted of drug related crimes.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, this Code section shall not apply to any public employee in service on July 1, 1990, and shall apply only to those public employees entering public service after July 1, 1990. A public employee in service on July 1, 1990, who ceases to be a public employee and terminates his or her membership in a public retirement system after that date and who subsequently again becomes a public employee shall be subject to the provisions of this Code section, beginning with the date of such subsequent employment. Any person who was a public employee prior to July 1, 1990, and who ceased to be a public employee and terminated his or her membership in a public retirement system prior to that date shall be subject to the provisions of this Code section if such person again becomes a public employee after July 1, 1990, beginning with the date of such subsequent employment.

If a public employee who is not vested under a public retirement system commits a drug related crime and is convicted for the commission of such crime, such public employee shall forfeit all rights and benefits under and membership in the public retirement system in which the employee is not a vested member, effective on the date of final conviction. Any such public employee shall not at any time after such final conviction be eligible for membership in any public retirement system. Any employee contributions made by any such public employee to any public retirement system in which the employee is not a vested member shall be reimbursed, without interest, to the public employee within 60 days after the date of final conviction for the commission of the drug related crime.

If a public employee who is vested under a public retirement system commits a drug related crime, such employee’s active membership in any public retirement system shall terminate on the date of final conviction and such employee shall not at any time thereafter be eligible for active membership in any public retirement system. For any such public employee, the right to any benefit or any other right under any public retirement system in which the employee is a vested member shall be determined as of the date of final conviction.

The provisions of Code Section 47-1-23 shall apply to a public employee charged with the commission of a drug related crime in the same manner that they apply to a public employee charged with the commission of a public employment related crime.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-22.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2019, § 2.

47-1-22.2.
Notification to public retirement system of conviction for public employment related crime.

Upon the final conviction of any person for a public employment related crime, the prosecuting attorney shall so notify the defendant’s former public employer and any public retirement system in which he or she knows the convicted public employee to be an active, inactive, or retired member. Upon such notification, the public employer shall also notify any such public retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-22.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 126, § 4/HB 255.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2008.

47-1-23.
Rights of public employee charged with committing public employment related crime.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to create a right for any public employee who is charged with the commission of a public employment related crime to remain a public employee or a member of a public retirement system until such employee is finally convicted for the commission of such crime. Nothing in this article shall be construed to create a right for a public employee who is charged with the commission of a public employment related crime to accrue rights or benefits under a public retirement system after the date any such employee ceases to be a member of such public retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1624, § 1.

47-1-24.
Benefits denied to beneficiary who murders or commits voluntary manslaughter of member of public retirement system.

No person who commits or conspires to commit the murder or voluntary manslaughter of a member, retiree, or beneficiary under a public retirement system shall receive any refund of contributions or any benefit under the public retirement system upon the death of the member, retiree, or beneficiary, even though the person so killing or conspiring is a named beneficiary for such refund of contributions or benefit.
A plea of guilty or a judicial finding of guilt which is not reversed or otherwise set aside as to any such crime shall be prima-facie evidence of guilt for the purpose of applying the provisions of this Code section.
All rights, interests, and entitlements to any such refund of contributions or benefit shall go to the secondary beneficiary designated by the member, retiree, or beneficiary, if a secondary beneficiary is designated and is living, upon the death of the member, retiree, or beneficiary,
but otherwise to the member’s, retiree’s, or beneficiary’s estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 690, § 1.

47-1-25.
Determination of economic impact of public employment related crime.

Within 30 days following the day the board of trustees receives notice that a member of the retirement system has been convicted of a public employment related crime, the board shall initiate proceedings in the Office of State Administrative Hearings, under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 50, to determine the economic impact of the public employment related crime. Such matter shall be deemed to be a contested case within the meaning of such article. The Department of Law shall represent the board of trustees in such proceedings. The decision of the administrative law judge shall be final unless appeal is made as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 126, § 5/HB 255; Ga. L. 2009, p. 368, § 1/SB 48.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 30, 2009, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct this title, substituted “a public employment related” for “an employment related” and substituted “the public employment related” for “the employment related” in this Code section.